Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.100

Duties and authority of the mayor—Veto—Tie-breaking vote.

The mayor shall be the chief executive and administrative officer of the city, in charge of all departments and employees, with authority to designate assistants and department heads. The mayor may appoint and remove a chief administrative officer or assistant administrative officer, if so provided by ordinance or charter. He or she shall see that all laws and ordinances are faithfully enforced and that law and order is maintained in the city, and shall have general supervision of the administration of city government and all city interests. All official bonds and bonds of contractors with the city shall be submitted to the mayor or such person as he or she may designate for approval or disapproval. He or she shall see that all contracts and agreements made with the city or for its use and benefit are faithfully kept and performed, and to this end he or she may cause any legal proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in the name of the city, subject to approval by majority vote of all members of the council. The mayor shall preside over all meetings of the city council, when present, but shall have a vote only in the case of a tie in the votes of the councilmembers with respect to matters other than the passage of any ordinance, grant, or revocation of franchise or license, or any resolution for the payment of money. He or she shall report to the council concerning the affairs of the city and its financial and other needs, and shall make recommendations for council consideration and action. He or she shall prepare and submit to the council a proposed budget, as required by chapter 35A.33 RCW. The mayor shall have the power to veto ordinances passed by the council and submitted to him or her as provided in RCW 35A.12.130 but such veto may be overridden by the vote of a majority of all councilmembers plus one more vote. The mayor shall be the official and ceremonial head of the city and shall represent the city on ceremonial occasions, except that when illness or other duties prevent the mayor's attendance at an official function and no mayor pro tempore has been appointed by the council, a member of the council or some other suitable person may be designated by the mayor to represent the city on such occasion.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3010; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 22; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.100.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.